Alabama, session 2026rs, SB242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
16 Section 1. Section 32-6-49.18, Code of Alabama 1975, is
17 amended to read as follows:
18 "§32-6-49.18
19 (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a an
20 personindividual may drive a commercial motor vehicle in this
21 state if the individual meets the following requirements:
22 (1) the person The individual has:
23 a. a A valid commercial driver license or commercial
24 driver license instruction learner permit issued by any state
25 or provinces or territories of Canada, territory, or
26 possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or
27 the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico in accordance with the minimum
28 federal standards for the issuance of commercial motor vehicle
Page 1

federal standards for the issuance of commercial motor vehicle
SB242 Enrolled
29 driver licenses, ; or
30 b. Both a commercial driver license or commercial
31 learner permit issued by Canada, Mexico, or any other
32 jurisdiction under a waiver or exemption recognized by the
33 Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration and the additional
34 entry documents required under 8 C.F.R. § 214.2(b)(4).
35 (2)if the The license is not suspended, revoked, or
36 canceled; and if the personindividual is not disqualified from
37 driving a commercial motor vehicle, or subject to an out of
38 service order.
39 (b) The department must Alabama State Law Enforcement
40 Agency shall give all out of state convictions full faith and
41 credit and treat them for sanctioning purposes under this
42 article as if they occurred in this state."
43 Section 2. Division 3, commencing with Section
44 32-6-49.60, is added to Article 1A of Chapter 6 of Title 32,
45 Code of Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
46 Division 3
47 §32-6-49.60
48 This division shall be known and may cited as the
49 Highway Safety and Fairness Act.
50 §32-6-49.61
51 For the purposes of this division, the following terms
52 have the following meanings:
53 (1) COMMERCIAL DRIVER LICENSE (CDL). A license issued
54 to an individual in accordance with the requirements of this
55 article, which authorizes the individual to drive a class of
56 commercial motor vehicle.
Page 2

commercial motor vehicle.
SB242 Enrolled
57 (2) COMMERCIAL LEARNER PERMIT (CLP). A permit issued to
58 an individual by a state or other jurisdiction of domicile, in
59 accordance with the standards contained in 49 C.F.R. Part 383,
60 which, when carried with a valid driver license issued by the
61 same state or jurisdiction, authorizes the individual to
62 operate a class of a commercial motor vehicle when accompanied
63 by a holder of a valid CDL for purposes of behind-the-wheel
64 training.
65 (3) COMMERCIAL MOTOR VEHICLE. The term as defined under
66 Section 32-6-49.3.
67 (4) FOREIGN GOVERNMENT. Any jurisdiction other than a
68 state, territory, province, or possession of the United
69 States.
70 (5) PUBLIC DOCUMENT. a. All official books, papers,
71 exhibits, or records of any type required by law to be created
72 by or received and retained in a governmental office or
73 agency, affording notice or information to the public or
74 constituting a memorial of an act or transaction of a public
75 office or public servant.
76 b. A license, certificate, permit, seal, title, letter
77 of patent, or similar document issued by a state, territory,
78 or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia,
79 or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico or a foreign government
80 engaged in a reciprocal treaty or memorandum of understanding
81 with the United States.
82 §32-6-49.62
83 (a) An individual commits the offense of presenting a
84 false foreign commercial driver license if the individual
Page 3

false foreign commercial driver license if the individual
SB242 Enrolled
85 knowingly:
86 (1) Makes, presents, or uses a public document with
87 knowledge of the falsity of the public document and with the
88 intent that the public document be taken as a genuine public
89 document; and
90 (2) Represents that a false public document made,
91 presented, or used under subdivision (1) is a valid commercial
92 driver license or commercial learner permit issued by a
93 foreign government.
94 (b) A violation of this section is a Class D felony.
95 §32-6-49.63
96 (a) An individual commits the offense of operating a
97 commercial motor vehicle without proper documentation if the
98 individual knowingly:
99 (1) Holds a valid commercial driver license issued by a
100 foreign government; and
101 (2) Does not have the additional entry documents
102 required under 8 C.F.R. § 214.2(b)(4) in his or her immediate
103 possession while operating a commercial motor vehicle.
104 (b)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (2), a
105 violation of this section is a Class D felony and subject to
106 any of the following:
107 a. The impounding of the commercial motor vehicle.
108 b. A one thousand dollar ($1,000) fine for the driver.
109 c. A two thousand dollar ($2,000) fine for the
110 commercial motor carrier.
111 (2) A violation of this section is a Class A
112 misdemeanor if the individual establishes by a preponderance
Page 4

misdemeanor if the individual establishes by a preponderance
SB242 Enrolled
113 of the evidence that at the time the offense was committed,
114 the individual had been issued the additional entry documents
115 required under 8 C.F.R. § 214.2(b)(4).
116 §32-6-49.64
117 (a) An operator of a commercial motor vehicle shall be
118 able to read and speak the English language sufficiently to
119 meet the English language proficiency requirements under 49
120 C.F.R. § 391.11.
121 (b) An individual commits the offense of operating a
122 commercial motor vehicle without sufficient English language
123 proficiency if the individual:
124 (1) Operates a commercial motor vehicle; and
125 (2) Fails to demonstrate proficiency in the English
126 language as required under subsection (a).
127 (c)(1) For a first violation of this section, a person
128 who violates this section is guilty of a traffic violation,
129 which shall be punished by a fine of up to one thousand
130 dollars ($1,000) for the operator, a fine of up to two
131 thousand dollars ($2,000) for the commercial motor carrier,
132 and the impoundment of the commercial motor vehicle if it is
133 determined that the operator or the commercial motor vehicle
134 poses a threat to public safety.
135 (2) A second or subsequent violation of this section
136 shall be punished by a fine of up to two thousand dollars
137 ($2,000) for the operator, a fine of up to four thousand
138 dollars ($4,000) for the commercial motor carrier, and the
139 impoundment of the commercial motor vehicle.
140 (d)(1) The law enforcement officer making the
Page 5

(d)(1) The law enforcement officer making the
SB242 Enrolled
141 impoundment shall direct an approved towing service to tow the
142 commercial motor vehicle to the garage of the towing service,
143 storage lot, or other place of safety and maintain custody and
144 control of the commercial motor vehicle until the registered
145 owner or authorized agent of the registered owner claims the
146 commercial motor vehicle by paying all reasonable and
147 customary towing and storage fees for the services of the
148 towing company. The commercial motor vehicle shall then be
149 released to the registered owner or an agent of the owner.
150 (2) Any towing service or towing company removing the
151 commercial motor vehicle at the direction of the law
152 enforcement officer in accordance with this section shall have
153 a lien on the commercial motor vehicle for all reasonable and
154 customary fees relating to the towing and storage of the
155 commercial motor vehicle. This lien shall be subject and
156 subordinate to all prior security interests and other liens
157 affecting the commercial motor vehicle whether evidenced on
158 the certificate of title or otherwise. Notice of any sale or
159 other proceedings relative to this lien shall be given to the
160 holders of all prior security interest or other liens by
161 official service of process at least 15 days prior to any sale
162 or other proceedings.
163 (3) Any person in possession of a commercial motor
164 vehicle impounded pursuant to this section shall be subject to
165 the provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 32, relating to the
166 impoundment and sale of abandoned vehicles; Section 32-8-84,
167 relating to the procedures for unclaimed vehicles; and Section
168 41-27-61, relating to the procedures for freight retrieval of
Page 6

41-27-61, relating to the procedures for freight retrieval of
SB242 Enrolled
169 impounded commercial vehicles.
170 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
171 1, 2026.
Page 7

1, 2026.
SB242 Enrolled
172
173
174
175
176
177
178 ________________________________________________
179 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
180
181
182
183 ________________________________________________
184 Speaker of the House of Representatives
185
186
187 SB242
188 Senate 17-Feb-26
189 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
190 the Senate.
191
192 Patrick Harris,
193 Secretary.
194
195
196
197
198 House of Representatives
199 Amended and passed: 05-Mar-26
200
201
202
203
204 Senate concurred in House amendment 05-Mar-26
205
206
207
208
209 By: Senator Bell
Page 8